District of Columbia statutes.
42-1601

Writ of waste; lease forfeited for waste and lessee to pay treble damages.

A man from henceforth shall have a writ of waste in the chancery against him that holdeth by law, or otherwise for term of life, or for term of years; and he which shall be attainted of waste, shall lease the thing that he hath wasted, and moreover shall recompense thrice so much as the waste shall be taxed at.

6 Edw. 1, ch. 5, § 1, 1278
Kilty’s Rep. 211
Alex. Br. Stat. 83
Comp. Stat. D.C., 319, § 21
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 41, 23 DCR 2544
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 804, 48 DCR 2087
1981 Ed., § 45-1201.
1973 Ed., § 45-1301.
D.C. Law 13-292 deleted “, or in dower” following “for term of years”.